Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6022
Supplemental provisions.

(1) The provisions of the Insurers and Health Organizations Risk-Based Capital Act are supplemental to any other provisions of the laws of this state and shall not preclude or limit any other powers or duties of the director under such laws, including, but not limited to, the Nebraska Insurers Supervision, Rehabilitation, and Liquidation Act.

(2) The director may exempt from the application of the Insurers and Health Organizations Risk-Based Capital Act a domestic health organization which:

(a)(i) Writes direct business only in this state;

(ii) Assumes no reinsurance in excess of five percent of direct premium written; and

(iii) Writes direct annual premiums for comprehensive medical business of two million dollars or less; or

(b) Is a limited health service organization that covers fewer than two thousand lives.

Laws 1993, LB 583, § 34;

Laws 1994, LB 978, § 43;

Laws 1999, LB 258, § 27.

Nebraska Insurers Supervision, Rehabilitation, and Liquidation Act, see section 44-4862.